Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.071

Remedies of creditors.

(1) In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a creditor, subject to the limitations in RCW 19.40.081, may obtain:

(a) Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor's claim;

(b) An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee if available under applicable law; and

(c) Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

(i) An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

(ii) Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

(iii) Any other relief the circumstances may require.

(2) If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

[ 2017 c 57 s 7; 2000 c 171 s 54; 1987 c 444 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 444: See note following RCW 19.40.011.